Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1243
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to administer and enforce the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act, including rules, regulations, and reporting requirements relating to proposals pursuant to subdivisions (4)(d) and (e) of section 81-12,241.

Laws 2020, LB866, § 19;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 36;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 18.
April 17, 2024